Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.125

Custom meat facilities—Sale of inspected meat—Ordinances may be more restrictive.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the sale of inspected meat in custom meat facilities do not supersede or restrict the authority of any county or any city to adopt ordinances that are more restrictive for the handling and sale of inspected meat than those provided in this chapter.

[ 2000 c 99 s 13; 1999 c 291 s 29; 1987 c 77 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 98 s 9. Formerly RCW 16.49.670.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.